District of Columbia statutes.
8-2103.03

Expired

Disbursements from the Fund.

Expired.

Oct. 19, 2000, D.C. Law 13-172, § 906, 47 DCR 6308
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see §§ 902 to 908 of the Fiscal Year 2001 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-438, October 20, 2000, 47 DCR 8740).
Pursuant to subsection (f) of this section, this section expired on September 30, 2002.